en: Farmed rainbow trout
fr: Truite arc en ciel d'élevage

en: Salmon trout
de: Lachsforelle
fr: Truite saumonée
hr: Losos pastrva

en: Carp
de: Karpfen
fr: Carpe
hr: Šaran
ja: コイ, 鯉

en: Farmed Carp
fr: Carpe d'élevage

en: Smoked carp
fr: Carpe fumée

en: Frozen farmed carp
fr: Carpe d'élevage surgelée

en: Farmed Carp fillets
fr: Filets de carpe d'élevage

en: Frozen farmed Carp fillets
fr: Filets de carpe d'élevage surgelés

en: European perch
fr: Perche

en: Roasted European perch, Baked European perch
fr: Perche rôtie, Perche cuite au four

en: Nile perch
fr: Perche du Nil

en: Frozen nile perch
fr: Perche du Nil surgelée

en: Cooked trouts
fr: Truites cuites

en: Roasted rainbow trout from farming, Baked rainbow trout from farming
fr: Truite arc en ciel d'élevage rôtie, truite arc en ciel élevage cuite au four

en: Steamed rainbow trout from farming
fr: Truite arc en ciel d'élevage cuite à la vapeur

en: Roasted trout, baked trout
fr: Truite rôtie, truite cuite au four

en: Steamed trouts, Trout steamed
fr: Truite cuite à la vapeur

en: Red gurnard
fr: Grondin

en: Tunas, Thunnus
bg: Риба тон
ca: Tonyina
da: Tun
de: Thunfische, Thunfisch
es: Atunes, atun
fi: tonnikalat
fr: Thons
he: טונה
hr: Tune
hu: Tonhalak
it: Tonno, tonni
ja: ツナ, マグロ, 鮪
la: Thunnus
nl: Tonijn
pl: Tuńczyki, Tuńczyk
pt: Atum
ru: Тунец
th: ทูน่า
zh: 吞拿鱼

en: Raw tunas
fr: Thons crus, thon cru